District of Columbia statutes.
47-4204

Underpayment of estimated tax by corporations, financial institutions, and unincorporated businesses.

(a)

A corporation, financial institution, or unincorporated business shall pay 4 installments of estimated tax as provided in § 47-1812.14 in the amount provided under subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

(1)

The amount of each installment of estimated tax shall be the lesser of:

(A)

The amount required under the annualized income method under paragraph (2) of this subsection; or

(B)

Twenty-five percent of the lesser of:

(i)

Ninety percent of the tax shown on the return of the entity for the taxable year (or, if no return is filed, 100% of the tax for the taxable year); or

(ii)

(I)

Except as provided in sub-sub-subparagraph (II) of this sub- subparagraph, 100% of the tax shown on the return of the entity for the preceding taxable year if the individual filed a return for the preceding taxable year consisting of 12 months; or

(II)

For tax years beginning after December 31, 2011, 110% of the tax shown on the return of the entity for the preceding taxable year if the individual filed a return for the preceding taxable year consisting of 12 months.

(2)

(A)

The required payments under the annualized income method shall be, on a cumulative basis, as follows:

(i)

On the first installment date, 22.5% of the tax for the taxable year based upon the annualized income of the entity for the first 3 months of the taxable year;

(ii)

On the second installment date, 45% of the tax for the taxable year based upon the annualized income of the entity for the first 5 months of the taxable year;

(iii)

On the third installment date, 67.5% of the tax for the taxable year based upon the annualized income of the entity for the first 8 months of the taxable year; and

(iv)

On the fourth installment date, 90% of the tax for the taxable year based upon the annualized income of the entity for the first 9 months of taxable year.

(B)

The annualized income method shall not apply to entities filing a return for part of a taxable year except under regulations as the Mayor may prescribe.

(c)

(1)

Except as otherwise provided in this section, in the case of an underpayment of estimated tax by a corporation, financial institution, or unincorporated business, there shall be added to the tax imposed under Chapter 18 of this title an amount of interest determined by applying the underpayment rate set forth in § 47-4201 to the amount of the underpayment for the period of the underpayment.

(2)

For the purposes of this subsection:

(A)

The amount of the underpayment shall be the excess of the required installment over the amount, if any, of the installment paid on or before the due date for the installment; and

(B)

The period of the underpayment shall run from the due date for the installment to the earlier of the 15th day of the 3rd month following the close of the taxable year or the date on which the amount of the underpayment is made; provided, that an underpayment that is unpaid during part of a month shall be considered to be paid at the end of the month.

(d)

For the purposes of this section:

(1)

A payment of estimated tax shall be credited against unpaid required installments in the order in which the installments are required to be paid.

(2)

The term “tax” means the tax imposed by § 47-1807.02 or § 47-1808.03, less the amount of credit allowed against the tax (other than the credit with respect to payments of tax).

(3)

The amount of a refund of a prior year’s tax applied against the tax during the taxable year shall be deemed a payment of estimated tax.

(e)

Interest shall not be imposed under subsection (c) of this section for a taxable year if:

(1)

The tax shown on the return for the taxable year (or, if no return is filed, the tax) reduced by applicable credits and estimated payments that are made timely, is less than $1,000; or

(2)

The preceding taxable year was a taxable year of 12 months, and the entity did not have any liability for tax for the preceding taxable year.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7122(b), 61 DCR 9990
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 7123 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that this subtitle shall be applicable for tax years beginning after December 31, 2014.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see §§ 7122(b) and 7123 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see §§ 7122(b) and 7123 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see §§ 7132(b) and 7133 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).